Wisconsin, session 2025, SB789.
do enact as follows:SB789,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB789,28Section 2. 20.465 (3) (cm) and (cp) of the statutes are created to read:SB789,2,10920.465 (3) (cm) Grants for security of religious organizations. As a continuing 10appropriation, the amounts in the schedule to award grants under s. 323.64.SB789,2,1211(cp) Administration of grants for security of religious organizations. A sum 12sufficient to administer the grant program under s. 323.64.SB789,313Section 3. 323.64 of the statutes is created to read:SB789,2,1814323.64 Grants for security of religious organizations. (1) The division 15shall award grants to nonprofit religious organizations for security purposes. In 16awarding grants, the division shall give priority to applicants that are a target or 17are at risk of being a target of an incident or crime that is motivated, in whole or in 18part, by the actor’s bias against a religion or religious group.SB789,3,219(2) The division shall accept grant applications from any nonprofit religious 20organization, including federations, networks, or other umbrella organizations on 21behalf of a member. The department of justice may not award to a single recipient 22a grant under this section that is more than $500,000 per fiscal biennium except 23that, if a federation, network, or other umbrella organization applies on behalf of 24more than one member, the federation, network, or umbrella organization may be 1awarded no more than $500,000 per fiscal biennium per each member on whose 2behalf the federation, network, or umbrella organization is applying.SB789,3,43(3) A grant awarded under sub. (1) may be used for any of the following 4purposes:SB789,3,75(a) To enhance the physical security of a location, including installing a 6surveillance system, fortifying entryways, improving lights, installing fencing, or 7securing access points.SB789,3,108(b) To train or hire individuals, including training staff, members, or 9volunteers to improve crisis response capabilities or hiring security personnel at 10high-risk locations.SB789,3,1311(c) To prepare for an emergency, including developing emergency operations, 12coordinating with law enforcement agencies, conducting active threat drills, and 13enhancing communication systems.SB789,414Section 4. Nonstatutory provisions.SB789,3,1715(1) The authorized FTE positions for the department of military affairs are 16increased by 2.0 GPR positions, to be funded from the appropriation under s. 20.465 17(3) (cp), for the purpose of administering the grant program under s. 323.64.SB789,3,1818